District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.160

Repealed

Close corporations — Voluntary termination of close corporation status by amendment of articles of incorporation; vote required.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 160
as added Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(ggg), 39 DCR 4863)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.160.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.59.